Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5058YH (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2004 Section 1. Section 280.13D, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 280.13D Participation in extracurricular interscholastic 3 athletic contests or competitions and extracurricular 4 interscholastic activities provided by public schools. 5 1. a. The board of directors of a school district shall 6 allow a student who resides within the school district, 7 and who is enrolled in a nonpublic school, to participate 8 in any extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or 9 competition , and any extracurricular interscholastic activity, 10 including theater, show choir, and band, that is provided by 11 the school district pursuant to the terms of an agreement 12 between the board of directors of the school district and the 13 authorities in charge of the nonpublic school that provides 14 for the eligibility of the student, if all of the following 15 criteria are satisfied: 16 (1) The extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest 17 or competition or extracurricular interscholastic activity 18 has not been provided by the nonpublic school during the two 19 immediately preceding school years. 20 (2) The nonpublic school has not entered into an agreement 21 under section 280.13A with another school district, nonpublic 22 school, or charter school that provides for the eligibility of 23 students enrolled in the nonpublic school to participate in the 24 extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or competition 25 or extracurricular interscholastic activity that is being 26 provided by that school district, nonpublic school, or charter 27 school. 28 b. The board of directors of a school district shall allow 29 a student who resides within a contiguous school district, 30 and who is enrolled in a nonpublic school, to participate 31 in any extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or 32 competition and any extracurricular interscholastic activity 33 that is provided by the school district pursuant to the terms 34 of an agreement between the board of directors of the school 35 -1- LSB 5058YH (2) 91 mb/jh 1/ 4 H.F. 2004 district and the authorities in charge of the nonpublic school 1 that provides for the eligibility of the student, if all of the 2 following criteria are satisfied: 3 (1) The extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest 4 or competition or extracurricular interscholastic activity has 5 not been provided by the nonpublic school or by the studentâs 6 school district of residence during the two immediately 7 preceding school years. 8 (2) The nonpublic school has not entered into an agreement 9 under section 280.13A with another school district, nonpublic 10 school, or charter school that provides for the eligibility of 11 students enrolled in the nonpublic school to participate in the 12 extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or competition 13 or extracurricular interscholastic activity that is being 14 provided by that school district, nonpublic school, or charter 15 school. 16 c. If the board of directors of a school district has 17 established a fee for the cost of a studentâs participation 18 in an extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or 19 competition or extracurricular interscholastic activity , 20 a student who is enrolled in a nonpublic school and is 21 participating in a contest , or competition , or activity at a 22 public school pursuant to paragraph âaâ or âbâ , or the studentâs 23 parent or guardian, shall be responsible for the payment of 24 such fee. The amount of such fee shall not exceed the amount 25 of the fee the board of directors of the school district 26 has established for students who are enrolled in the school 27 district. 28 2. A student who is enrolled in a nonpublic school and is 29 participating in a an extracurricular interscholastic contest 30 or competition or extracurricular interscholastic activity at a 31 public school pursuant to subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ or âbâ , 32 shall participate under the same conditions as a student who is 33 enrolled in the school district, including meeting the school 34 districtâs student code of conduct requirements. 35 -2- LSB 5058YH (2) 91 mb/jh 2/ 4 H.F. 2004 3. A student who participates in an extracurricular 1 interscholastic athletic contest or competition or 2 extracurricular interscholastic activity pursuant to this 3 section shall be deemed to satisfy the residence requirements 4 for purposes of section 256.46 . 5